Hawaii statutes.
§412:2-510 Commissioner's powers. No
provision under this part shall be construed to limit, modify, or restrain any
other powers otherwise granted to the commissioner or the division. The
provisions of this part shall supplement and provide an alternative to the
commissioner's other authority and powers under this article. [L 1993, c 350,
pt of §1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next